Utah statutes.
76-10-405.   Reimbursement of government response expenses.
In addition to any other penalty authorized by law, a court shall order any
person convicted of any violation of this part to reimburse any federal,
state, or local unit of government, or any private business, organization,
individual, or entity for all expenses and losses incurred in responding to
the violation, unless the court states on the record the reasons why the
reimbursement would be inappropriate.
